Utah statutes.
56-3-1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Human waste" means excrement, feces, gray water, or other waste material
discharged from the human body.
(2)  "Person" means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company,
corporation, partnership, association, state, state or federal agency or
entity, municipality, commission, or political subdivision of a state.
(3)  "Passenger train" means any train operated by a railroad company or
corporation pursuant to Title 56, Chapter 1 for the primary purpose of
transporting passengers for hire.
